Illinois, session 104th, SB3690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.15 and by adding Section 7.16 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/7.15)7    Sec. 7.15. Limitations on gaming at Chicago airports. The 8Chicago casino may conduct gaming operations in an airport 9under the administration or control of the Chicago Department 10of Aviation. Gaming operations may be conducted pursuant to 11this Section so long as: (i) gaming operations are conducted 12in a secured area that is beyond the Transportation Security 13Administration security checkpoints and only available to 14airline passengers at least 21 years of age who are members of 15a private club, and not to the general public, (ii) gaming 16operations are limited to slot machines, as defined in Section 174 of the Illinois Gambling Act, and video gaming terminals, as 18defined in Section 5 of the Video Gaming Act, and (iii) the 19combined number of gaming positions operating in the City of 20Chicago at the airports and at the temporary and permanent 21casino facility does not exceed the maximum number of gaming 22positions authorized pursuant to subsection (h) of Section 7 23of the Illinois Gambling Act. Gaming operations at an airport   SB3690- 2 -LRB104 19236 LNS 32682 b1are subject to all applicable laws and rules that apply to any 2other gaming facility under the Illinois Gambling Act.3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 4    (230 ILCS 10/7.16 new)5    Sec. 7.16. Distribution of revenue from gaming at Chicago 6airports. Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly, 10% of the total revenue 8generated by gaming operations conducted under Section 7.15 9shall be distributed as follows:10        (1) For revenue generated at the O'Hare International 11    Airport, 1/6 to any municipalities and governing bodies 12    that participate in a mutual aid agreement to serve O'Hare 13    International Airport, with no more than 50% of that 14    revenue distributed to contiguous municipalities, 1/6 to 15    City of Chicago ward facilities where the airport is 16    located, 1/6 to Chicago Park District facilities serving 17    the area where the airport is located, 1/6 to the Chicago 18    public schools serving the area where the airport is 19    located, 1/6 to Chicago Police Department facilities 20    serving the area where the airport is located, and 1/6 to 21    the Residential Sound Insulation Program.22        (2) For revenue generated at the Chicago Midway 23    International Airport, 2% to City of Chicago ward 24    facilities where the airport is located, 2% to Chicago 25    Park District facilities serving the area where the   SB3690- 3 -LRB104 19236 LNS 32682 b1    airport is located, 2% to the Chicago public schools 2    serving the area where the airport is located, 2% to 3    Chicago Police Department facilities serving the area 4    where the airport is located, and 2% to the Residential 5    Sound Insulation Program.